Utah statutes.
7-2-14.   Expenses during possession.

The expenses reimbursable to the commissioner during possession or in the course of proceedings under this chapter include the compensation of deputies, agents, clerks, and examiners employed by him and reasonable fees for counsel, accountants or consultants employed by him or on his behalf. The compensation shall be fixed by the commissioner subject to the approval of the court. The expenses of the proceedings shall be paid out of the property of the institution in the hands of the commissioner, shall be a valid charge against that property, and shall be paid first in order of priority. No expenses may be paid out of the property of the institution until an account of the expense has been filed with and approved by the court.



Amended by Chapter 8, 1983 General Session

